public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/vec2.dic
arear/A
albiđar/A
inaƚokar/A
amaredar/A
aneƚar/A
arborar/A
inarxerar/A
aromatiđar/A
inasiar/A
asertar/A
autoriđar/A
inaxiar/A
xbafarar/A
xbaɉar/A
trabalar/A
inbalegar/A
xbalonar/A
inbalŧar/A
inbaƚukar/A
arbandonar/A
xbaraɉar/A
barbotar/A
inbaronar/A
debàter/A
rebatiđar/A
dexbaukar/A
xbavesar/A
xbefeđar/A
inbendar/A
inbestiaƚir/A
xbevaŧar/A
xbiankidar/A
inbilar/A
dexbingoƚar/A
bisakar/A
xbixigolar/A
strabójer/A
inbokar/A
bolar/A
xbolsonar/A
bondar/A
bordar/A
borondoƚar/A
botedar/A
boŧar/A
inbovoƚar/A
dexbragesar/A
bramixar/A
abrasar/A
brevetar/A
briƚantar/A
brojar/A
xbroentar/A
brulegar/A
budeƚar/A
inbugar/A
inbutiliar/A
xbuxetar/A
capar/A
descavar/A
cèñer/A
ascéñer/A
cetarar/A
incokar/A
incukar/A
indafarar/A
debutar/A
denteƚar/A
devorŧiar/A
dixdisiar/A
dixertar/A
indolentrar/A
domandar/A
doparar/A
dexdoronar/A
doxar/A
indriŧar/A
reprodúxer/A
xalixar/A
davariar/A
xogar/A
malđontar/A
konxónxer/A
ađornar/A
xugar/A
durar/A
ebraidar/A
ekuipajar/A
enpir/A
esir/A
exaɉerar/A
exersitar/A
rarefar/A
fadar/A
faldeɉar/A
falsidiar/A
fameliaridar/A
infarinar/A
fatuar/A
faxanar/A
skarnifegar/A
sakrifegar/A
infemenir/A
aferir/A
konfermar/A
dexenfetar/A
infiankar/A
sfibrar/A
fifar/A
sfilar/A
konfinar/A
fiorar/A
infirmar/A
fitar/A
influensar/A
infoibar/A
foledar/A
forar/A
sformar/A
informigoƚar/A
sforŧar/A
infradelar/A
frantonar/A
infrapolar/A
sfratar/A
parafraxar/A
sfregoƚar/A
sfríxer/A
sfroñar/A
frutuar/A
fulminar/A
funsionar/A
fúxer/A
galar/A
galidar/A
xgaƚonar/A
xgarar/A
ingarofolir/A
xgiansar/A
gongolar/A
xgrafar/A
xgrankir/A
ingravidar/A
xgretoƚir/A
xgrisar/A
ingrotir/A
guarentar/A
reguxar/A
ingaxar/A
inritar/A
ipotixar/A
ɉaŧar/A
jeƚomarar/A
injòter/A
jubilar/A
deskaenar/A
skaldar/A
inkaƚorir/A
inkamufar/A
inkanevar/A
kantusar/A
inkaponar/A
karesar/A
deskartar/A
kasegar/A
katekiđar/A
kauterixar/A
akaxar/A
kogoƚar/A
inkolar/A
rekoltar/A
koncar/A
konseliar/A
akonsar/A
sokórer/A
skòrxer/A
skortegar/A
inkosir/A
skrekolar/A
krokolar/A
krovar/A
inkucar/A
inkukar/A
kurar/A
lakonidar/A
ƚansar/A
stralasar/A
inlear/A
legrar/A
levar/A
paraliđar/A
limitar/A
ƚitigar/A
dexlontanar/A
lumar/A
ƚuxingar/A
maliŧiar/A
maneđar/A
xmañasar/A
martelar/A
dexmaskarar/A
dexmasar/A
mexar/A
inmeƚar/A
xmeraveɉar/A
perméter/A
minconar/A
modular/A
mòlđer/A
stramontar/A
morfir/A
motexar/A
inmufir/A
mutolir/A
naturalidar/A
xnervadar/A
nolexar/A
dexnuar/A
ñokoƚar/A
inokar/A
ondiđar/A
dexordenar/A
abortir/A
inpacugar/A
spakar/A
spaƚesar/A
inpaludar/A
spanŧar/A
rekonparir/A
spartir/A
pasiđar/A
inpatar/A
inpavejar/A
inpegolar/A
inpeƚugar/A
respénxer/A
pentir/A
personalixar/A
petexolar/A
peŧolatar/A
piànder/A
spiegar/A
piñorar/A
pironar/A
piŧolar/A
poer/A
spolverixar/A
desponarar/A
pontiđar/A
porkexar/A
ipotegar/A
reprénder/A
inpriar/A
proviđar/A
purgar/A
skorabiar/A
ranbar/A
irapar/A
reciđar/A
xregoƚar/A
ribelar/A
risoƚar/A
roeɉar/A
ronbar/A
rostir/A
inruxenir/A
ruvijar/A
konsakrar/A
salidar/A
sanɉotar/A
insavonar/A
scopidar/A
rasekurar/A
sejar/A
semolar/A
inseñar/A	po:verb
sesoƚar/A
sibilar/A
simular/A
skainar/A
skarabotar/A
iskeletrar/A
skiumar/A
skrinsar/A
insoasar/A
insolentar/A
resomejar/A
sòrxer/A
sparlacar/A
spergosar/A
spigasar/A
despoɉar/A
konstar/A
starnir/A
instaurar/A
restimar/A
istivaƚar/A
stranbar/A
striar/A
ostruir/A
stupir/A
susultar/A
suŧar/A
staɉusar/A
tanburar/A
tarixar/A
intavanar/A
tèmer/A
stenperar/A
ateñir/A
tratèñer/A
terminar/A
timonar/A
toir/A
stonar/A
torbiar/A
tòrxer/A
intovajar/A
traɉar/A
intrapoƚar/A
straviar/A
trexendar/A
tromentar/A
trukar/A
sakoƚar/A
ŧavarɉar/A
inŧefar/A
insendiar/A
desernir/A
reŧéver/A
inŧiganar/A
resiñar/A
ŧiviliđar/A
insopar/A
ukelar/A
maluxar/A
validar/A
vansar/A
xvedeƚar/A
velenar/A
ventiđar/A
reveñir/A
verdedar/A
xvergolar/A
veroƚar/A
stravestir/A
inviƚir/A
virar/A
soravíver/A
voƚar/A
voltar/A
xvòlxer/A
exaudir/A
konxeƚar/A
xirandoƚar/A
xmorgolar/A
dexunar/A
indefenir/A
destar/A
evidensiar/A
konparar/A
xgraŧiar/A
funsiar/A
insordar/A
palexar/A
xbadejar/A
sfoɉolar/A
spaniŧar/A
đeneraliđar/A
moskar/A
desfortunar/A
dexditar/A
